Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 27 Motor Vehicle Offenses
31-27-5.
Motor carriers — Maximum driving and on-duty time.

Maximum driving time. Except for intrastate carrier tows and recovering operations provided at the request of a law enforcement agency for public safety purposes, no motor carrier shall permit or require any driver used by it to drive nor shall any driver exceed the hours for service for drivers as provided in 49 CFR Part 395, as may be amended from time to time.

Drivers may be declared out of service for violations of this section or 49 CFR Part 395 as may be amended from time to time.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 98, § 27; P.L. 1933, ch. 2023, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 104, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-5

; P.L. 1986, ch. 282, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 7; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 7.

31-27-6.
Lanes of operation.

Any bus, commercial vehicle, camper, vehicle registered as a camper, trailer, or vehicle carrying a camper or trailer traveling on Rhode Island interstate highways shall be allowed to travel only in the first two (2) right hand lanes, except in cases of left hand exits, in which case the vehicle shall be allowed to enter the third and fourth left hand lanes one mile prior to an exit.

For the purpose of this section, “commercial vehicle” means any vehicle registered for commercial purposes and designed and used primarily for the transportation of goods, wares, or merchandise. “Bus” means any vehicle designed for carrying ten (10) or more passengers and used primarily for the transportation of persons.

The provisions of this section shall only be effective during the period that official traffic signs are in place to notify operators of the provisions of this section. Any persons violating the provisions of this section upon conviction shall be fined not more than eighty-five dollars ($85.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 98, § 27; P.L. 1933, ch. 2023, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 104, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-6

; P.L. 1977, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 282, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 16.

31-27-7.
Commercial vehicles — Off-duty conditions — Emergency exceptions.

The periods of release from duty required in §§

31-27-5

and

31-27-6

shall be given at any places and under any circumstances that rest and relaxation from the strain of the duties of employment may be obtained. No period off duty shall be deemed to break the continuity of service unless it is for at least three (3) consecutive hours at a place where there is opportunity for rest. In case of an unfortunate emergency the driver may complete his or her run or tour of duty if the run or tour of duty but for the delay caused by the emergency would reasonably have been completed without a violation of §§

31-27-5

—

31-27-8

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 98, § 27; P.L. 1933, ch. 2023, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 104, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-7

.

31-27-8.
Commercial vehicles — Penalty for excessive hours of driving.

Any person, or the officers of any corporation, company, or association, who shall violate any provision of §§

31-27-5

—

31-27-7

, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not more than sixty (60) days, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 98, § 27; P.L. 1933, ch. 2023, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 104, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-8

.

31-27-9.
Parties to offenses.

Every person who commits, attempts to commit, conspires to commit, or aids or abets in the commission of, any act declared in chapters 1 — 27 or chapter 34 of this title to be a crime, whether individually or in connection with one or more other persons, or as a principal, agent, or accessory, shall be guilty of that offense, and every person who falsely, fraudulently, forcibly, or willfully induces, causes, coerces, requires, permits, or directs another to violate any provision of those chapters is similarly guilty of the offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 36, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-9

.

31-27-10.
Offenses by persons directing drivers.

It is unlawful for the owner, or any other person, employing or otherwise directing the driver of any vehicle to require or knowingly to permit the operation of a vehicle upon a highway in any manner contrary to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 36, § 2; G.L. 19

31-27-10

.

31-27-11.
Vehicle used as bail.

Any person arrested for violating any of the provisions of this title may tender as bail a motor vehicle of which he or she is the owner, and, if the person’s interest in the vehicle is of sufficient value, it may be accepted as security for the person’s appearance in lieu of any other bail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1916, ch. 1354, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 98, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 104, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-11

.

31-27-12.
Service of notice — Summons.

Any police officer observing the violation of any statute or ordinance relating to the operation, control, or maintenance of a motor vehicle or a violation of subparagraphs

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iii)

and

21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv)

, shall at the time or place of the violation or, if it is not possible to halt the alleged offender, as soon as possible after observing the violation, issue a written notice, of a form and content provided for in §

31-27-12.1

, signed by the police officer and constituting a summons to appear before the court having jurisdiction at a time and place designated in the notice.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a police officer from exercising in the alternative his or her statutory powers of arrest, nor shall anything contained in this chapter preclude the making of additional complaints against the alleged offender arising out of the violation of any statute or ordinance relating to the operation, control, or maintenance of a motor vehicle observed by the police officer. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a person other than a police officer from applying for a criminal complaint for the violation of any statute or ordinance relating to the operation, control, or maintenance of a motor vehicle, and the person need not show that the alleged offender has been issued a summons in connection with the alleged violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 36, § 4; redesignated art. 36, § 3 by P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-12

; P.L. 1959 (s. s.), ch. 190, § 7; P.L. 1970, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 221, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 233, § 3.

31-27-12.1.
Preparation of summons and related records — Content and form.

The summonses and related records shall be in a form approved by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal and subject to the approval of the supreme court. Summonses and related records shall be numbered consecutively with each summons and its related records bearing the same number, and each summons and its related records shall consist of five (5) parts:

The summons to be given the alleged offender;

A copy of the summons to be retained by the issuing police officer;

A request for complaint which shall be a copy of the original and which, when completed and signed shall direct the application for a complaint to the appropriate court or to a justice of the peace authorized to issue complaints;

A division of motor vehicles record which shall be a copy of the request for complaint and which shall also include an abstract of the court record;

The police record which shall also provide space for the recording of the disposition of the charge and which will be retained by the issuing police department or organization.

The summons and related record shall include, when completed, the signature of the officer observing the alleged violation, the name and address of the alleged offender, the number of his or her license, if any, to operate a motor vehicle, the registration number of the vehicle involved, the time and place of the alleged violation, and the substance of the offense charged.

The administrative clerk of the judicial department, upon the approval of the content and form of the summonses and related records by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal and subject to the approval of the supreme court, shall provide for the printing of them in books or pads, each of which shall contain an original and copy of a summary sheet to be used, providing space for a record of the use of the consecutively numbered summonses and related records contained in the book or pad.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 66, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 10.

31-27-12.2.
Distribution of books or pads.

The books or pads as provided in §

31-27-12.1(c)

shall be distributed as follows:

The administrative clerk of the judicial department shall distribute books or pads containing the summonses and related records to all courts having jurisdiction over the violation of any statute or ordinance relating to the operation, control, or maintenance of a motor vehicle, and shall keep a record of the distribution including a receipt signed by the clerk of each court for each book or pad distributed to the court.

Each court through its clerk shall distribute the books and pads to the chief administrative officer of every police department or state police barracks within its jurisdiction, and the clerk shall keep a record of the distribution, including a receipt signed by each chief administrative officer for each book or pad distributed to the clerk.

The chief administrative officers shall be responsible for the issuance of the books or pads to all police officers within their department or organization and shall keep a record of the distribution including a receipt signed by each police officer for each book or pad issued to that officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 66, § 2.

31-27-12.3.
Preparation and disposition of records.

Responsibility of individual officer. At or before the completion of his or her tour of duty, every police officer who has issued a summons from his or her book or pad shall retain a copy of the summons and shall deliver to the chief administrative officer of his or her department or organization or to the person duly authorized by the chief administrative officer the request for complaint, the division of motor vehicles record and police record all duly signed by the police officer together with all summonses spoiled, mutilated, or voided during the tour of duty, endorsed with a full explanation of each.

Each officer shall, upon using all summonses in a pad or book, return it to the chief administrative officer of his or her department or state police barracks or person duly authorized by him or her.

Responsibility of chief administrative officer of police department or state police barracks. Every chief administrative officer of a police department or state police barracks, or person duly authorized by him or her, shall, upon their receipt from a police officer who has issued a summons, deposit the completed copy, request for complaint, and the division of motor vehicles’ record with the court having jurisdiction of the alleged violation no later than two (2) days after the date of the issuance of the summons, Sundays and legal holidays excepted. The chief administrative officer shall retain for department records the form designated police record. The chief administrative officer shall also cause to be completed, in duplicate, the summary sheet for each pad or book noting on it the date of issuance of all summonses contained in the book, including the mutilation or destruction of any summonses contained in it together with the court complaint number issued and the disposition, if known, within ten (10) days after receipt of the used book or pad from the police officer and shall, within that time, deposit the original summary sheet signed by the chief administrative officer or person duly authorized by him or her to the clerk of the court which distributed the book or pad, retaining the copy for department records.

Responsibility of courts. A full record shall be kept by every court in this state of every case in which a person is charged with a violation of any provision of this title, or any act relative to motor vehicles, or to the operation of the vehicles. An abstract of that record shall be sent by the court to the division of motor vehicles within ten (10) days of the time when the case is disposed of.

In any case in which the charge is a violation of that portion of §

31-27-2(a)

relating to a person operating under the influence of intoxicating liquor, the case shall not be construed as disposed of, if sentence is imposed to attend a special course as provided in that section, until action has been taken by the court having jurisdiction of the charge upon completion of the course or upon a failure to complete it.

If a case was commenced by a summons as provided in §

31-27-12

, the abstract shall be made on the division of motor vehicles record provided in §

31-27-12

.1, and otherwise the abstract shall be made upon forms prepared by the division of motor vehicles. Every abstract shall include all necessary information as to the parties to the cause, the nature of the offense, the date of the hearing, the plea, the decision, the judgment and the result, and in case an operator or chauffeur shall plead guilty or nolo contendere or be found guilty of a violation of §

31-14-1

, the number of miles per hour by which the operator or chauffeur exceeded the reasonable and prudent speed, and every abstract shall be certified by the clerk of the court. The division of motor vehicles shall keep records and they shall be open to the public inspection during the business hours of the division of motor vehicles. The judge of any court in the state may, upon his or her own initiative, or upon the request of the division of motor vehicles or its agents, furnish to the division of motor vehicles the details of all particularly flagrant cases which may be heard before the judge and may make any recommendations to the division of motor vehicles as to the suspension of the license of the persons defendant in the case that the judge may deem necessary.

The clerk of every court which has issued pads or books of summonses and related records provided in §

31-27-12.1

shall be the initial custodian of all summary sheets returned to the court as provided in subsection (b) of this section. The clerk shall determine that all required information is included on the summary sheets and shall annually, during the month of July, deliver all summary sheets returned to his or her custody during the preceding twelve (12) months to the administrative clerk in the judicial department. The clerk shall also, during the month of July, determine the location of all pads or books and summonses distributed by him or her more than one year prior to the month, and the summary sheet for which has not been returned and shall, within the month, report his or her finding to the administrative clerk of the judicial department.

Responsibility of administrative clerk of judicial department. Upon receipt of the summary sheets and reports of clerks as provided by subsection (c) of this section, the administrative clerk of the judicial department shall be the custodian of them and shall keep the sheets and reports for a period of not less than three (3) years, and they shall be open to the public inspection during the hours when the office of the administrative clerk of the judicial department is open.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 66, § 2; P.L. 1974, ch. 120, § 3.

31-27-12.4.
Disposition of complaint only by court.

Upon the deposit of the complaint and the division of motor vehicle record of a violation with the court having jurisdiction of the alleged violations, the complaint of the violation shall be disposed of only by trial in the court or by other official action by a judge of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 66, § 2.

31-27-13.
Nature of offenses — Penalty.

It is a civil violation for any person to violate any of the provisions of chapters 1 — 27 or chapter 34 of this title, unless the violation is by these chapters or other law of this state declared to be a felony or a misdemeanor, or unless the offense is punishable by a fine of more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment.

Unless another penalty is provided by chapters 1 — 27 or chapter 34 of this title, or by the laws of this state, every person convicted of a civil violation of the chapters shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Unless another penalty is provided by chapters 1 — 27 or chapter 34 of this title or by the laws of this state, every person convicted of a misdemeanor violation of these chapters shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 8; art. 37, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-13

; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 14; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 6.

31-27-14.
Penalty for felonies.

Any person who is convicted of a violation of any provision of chapters 1 — 27 of this title, by this chapter or by the laws of this state declared to constitute a felony, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 37, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-14

.

31-27-15.
Disposition of fines and forfeitures.

All fines and forfeitures collected upon conviction or upon forfeiture of bail of any person charged with a violation of any of the provisions of chapters 1 — 46 of this title shall be deposited in the treasury of the state.

Provided, a city or town police department, enforcing any motor vehicle violation contained in this title, which results in a conviction, shall receive five dollars ($5.00) from any fine imposed in accordance with the provisions of §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 38, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-15

; P.L. 1978, ch. 217, § 1.

31-27-16.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 14; P.L. 2003, ch. 420, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 436, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 396, § 1, effective July 8, 2008.

31-27-17.
Permitting juvenile to operate an unregistered motorcycle.

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older who shall knowingly permit a person under the age of eighteen (18) years to operate a motorcycle as defined in § 31-3-1(h) when either the person under the age of eighteen (18) years of age is not licensed in accordance with the provisions of chapter 10.1 of this title, or where the motorcycle is not registered in accordance with the provisions of chapter 3 of this title, shall upon conviction be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 253, § 1.

31-27-18.
Emergency medical services — Special assessment.

The court and/or the traffic tribunal shall collect, in addition to any fine set forth in this title for a motor vehicle violation, and at the time of the assessment of the fine, an additional assessment of one dollar ($1.00) for each motor vehicle violation of this title. The one dollar ($1.00) assessment shall be paid over and accounted for in the manner provided in §§

31-27-15

and

31-41.1-4

, and shall be deposited as general revenues of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 104.

31-27-19.
Operating a motor vehicle on a bicycle lane, trail or path.

Except as provided in §

31-15-17

, no person shall operate any motor vehicle on a bicycle lane, trail or path, as defined in §

31-1-23(a)

.

Any person who operates a motor vehicle upon any bicycle lane, trail or path shall be punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

The division of motor vehicles, upon receiving a record of the conviction of any person upon a charge of operating a motor vehicle on a bicycle lane, trail or path, shall suspend the person’s operator’s license for a period of six (6) months.

Emergency vehicle and employees of federal, state, and local government shall be exempt from the provisions when acting in the scope of their official duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 302, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 16; P.L. 2005, ch. 64, § 7; P.L. 2005, ch. 67, § 7.

31-27-20.
Operation of a motor vehicle — Letter carrier.

Any employee of the United States Postal Service may operate his or her vehicle from the right or passenger side while performing their duties as a rural route letter carrier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 16.

31-27-21.
Community restitution.

The general assembly declares that the words “public community service” which appear throughout this chapter shall now be substituted with and referred to as “public community restitution”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 454, § 5.

31-27-22.
Street racing — Justin Nunes’ Law.

This act shall be known and may be cited as “Justin Nunes’ Law”.

For the purpose of this section, “street racing” means the act of two (2) or more individuals competing or racing in a situation in which one of the motor vehicles is beside or to the rear of a motor vehicle operated by a competing driver and one driver attempts to prevent the competing driver from passing or overtaking him or her, or one or more individuals competing in a race against time.

It shall be unlawful to engage in street racing on any public road, street or highway of this state, whether or not there is a formal agreement to race.

Every person convicted of a first violation of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be subject to imprisonment for not more than one year, a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and be required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution. The person’s license to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended for a period of not less than ninety (90) days nor more than six (6) months.

Every person convicted of a second violation within a five (5) year period, shall be guilty of a felony and be subject to imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and be required to perform sixty (60) to one hundred (100) hours of public community restitution. The person’s license to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended for no less than six (6) months nor more than two (2) years.

Every person convicted of a third (3rd) or subsequent violation within a five (5) year period, shall be guilty of a felony and be subject to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and required to perform not less than one hundred (100) hours of public community restitution. The person’s license to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended for no less than one year nor more than five (5) years.

Any person found in violation of subsection

31-27-22(b)

while having one or more passengers in their motor vehicle shall be subject to imprisonment of not more than five (5) years, and a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and be required to perform no more than one hundred (100) hours of public community restitution. The person’s license to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended for no less than one year. This enhanced sentence is to be served in addition and consecutively to the sentence provided for the underlying offense.

If a person is found in violation of subsection

31-27-22(b)

and the vehicle used in the violation is registered to that person or where the registrant permits the use of the vehicle, the vehicle may be impounded at the registered owner’s expense for not less than one day or more than thirty (30) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 193, § 1.

31-27-23.
Penalties for failure to comply with § 24-8-4.2.

Any employer who intentionally violates or fails to comply with any of the provisions of §

24-8-4.2

shall be subject to a fine of up to three hundred dollars ($300) for the first offense up to six hundred dollars ($600) for the second offense and up to nine hundred dollars ($900) for the third and subsequent offenses; said cumulative offenses shall be limited to the same job site or location and the same highway or bridge or contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 343, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 472, § 2.

31-27-24.
Multiple moving offenses.

Every person convicted of moving violations on four (4) separate and distinct occasions within an eighteen (18) month period may be fined up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), and shall be ordered to attend sixty (60) hours of driver retraining, shall be ordered to perform sixty (60) hours of public community service, and the person’s operator license in this state may be suspended up to one year or revoked by the court for a period of up to two (2) years. Prior to the suspension or revocation of a person’s license to operate within the state, the court shall make specific findings of fact and determine if the person’s continued operation of a motor vehicle would pose a substantial traffic safety hazard.

At the expiration of the time of revocation as set by the court pursuant to subsection (a) above, the person may petition that court for restoration of his or her privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state. The license privilege shall not thereafter be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the court, following a hearing, establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize refusal to issue a license and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.

For the purposes of this section only, the term “moving violations” shall mean any violation of the following sections of the general laws:

31-13-4

. Obedience to devices.

31-14-1

. Reasonable and prudent speeds.

31-14-2

. Prima facie limits.

31-14-3

. Conditions requiring reduced speeds.

31-15-5

. Overtaking on the right.

31-15-11

. Laned roadways.

31-15-12

. Interval between vehicles.

31-15-16

. Use of emergency break-down lane for travel.

31-17-4

. Vehicle entering stop or yield intersection.

31-20-9

. Obedience to stop signs.

31-27.1-3

. “Aggressive driving” defined.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 242, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 253, § 2.

31-27-25.
Ticket quotas prohibited.

No state or municipal agency engaged in the enforcement of any motor vehicle traffic or parking laws of this state, or any local ordinance governing motor vehicle traffic or parking, may establish or maintain any policy, formally or informally, requiring any officer to meet a quota.

As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:

“Officer” shall mean any peace officer as defined in §

12-7-21

and any police officer as defined in §

31-1-21

, and shall also include any individual engaged in enforcing ordinances authorized by chapter 28 of this title.

“Quota” means any requirement regarding the number of arrests or investigative stops made, or summonses or citations issued, by an officer regarding motor vehicle traffic or parking violations.

Nothing contained herein shall preclude a local or municipal agency from using data concerning arrests or investigative stops made, or summonses or citations issued, and their disposition in the evaluation of an officer’s work performance, provided such data is not the exclusive means of evaluating such performance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 159, § 1.